test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-a_32ma_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - lämmin - ok : # Noun 'warm'
     lämmin+A+Sg+Nom: lämmin
     lämmin+A+Sg+Gen: lämpimän
     lämmin+A+Sg+Par: lämmintä
     lämmin+A+Sg+Tra: lämpimäksi
     lämmin+A+Sg+Abe: lämpimättä
     lämmin+A+Sg+Ine: lämpimässä
     lämmin+A+Sg+Ela: lämpimästä
     lämmin+A+Sg+Ill: lämpimhään
     lämmin+A+Sg+Ade: lämpimällä
     lämmin+A+Sg+Abl: lämpimältä
     lämmin+A+Sg+All: lämpimälle
     lämmin+A+Sg+Ess: lämpimännä
     lämmin+A+Pl+Nom: lämpimät
     lämmin+A+Pl+Gen: lämpimiitten
     lämmin+A+Pl+Par: lämpimiitä
     lämmin+A+Pl+Tra: lämpimiksi
     lämmin+A+Pl+Abe: lämpimittä
     lämmin+A+Pl+Ine: lämpimissä
     lämmin+A+Pl+Ela: lämpimistä
     lämmin+A+Pl+Ill: lämpimhiin
     lämmin+A+Pl+Ade: lämpimillä
     lämmin+A+Pl+Abl: lämpimiltä
     lämmin+A+Pl+All: lämpimille
     lämmin+A+Pl+Com: lämpimine
     lämmin+A+Pl+Ess: lämpiminnä

     lämmin+A+Sg+Comp+Nom: lämpimämpi
     lämmin+A+Sg+Comp+Gen: lämpimämmän
     lämmin+A+Sg+Comp+Par: lämpimämppää
     lämmin+A+Sg+Comp+Tra: lämpimämmäksi
     lämmin+A+Sg+Comp+Abe: lämpimämmättä
     lämmin+A+Sg+Comp+Ine: lämpimämmässä
     lämmin+A+Sg+Comp+Ela: lämpimämmästä
     lämmin+A+Sg+Comp+Ill: lämpimämphään
     lämmin+A+Sg+Comp+Ade: lämpimämmälä
     lämmin+A+Sg+Comp+Abl: lämpimämmältä
     lämmin+A+Sg+Comp+All: lämpimämmäle
     lämmin+A+Sg+Comp+Ess: lämpimämpänä
     lämmin+A+Pl+Comp+Nom: lämpimämmät
     lämmin+A+Pl+Comp+Gen: lämpimämppiin
     lämmin+A+Pl+Comp+Par: [lämpimämppii, lämpimämppiitä, lämpimämpiä]
     lämmin+A+Pl+Comp+Tra: lämpimämmiksi
     lämmin+A+Pl+Comp+Abe: lämpimämmittä
     lämmin+A+Pl+Comp+Ine: lämpimämmissä
     lämmin+A+Pl+Comp+Ela: lämpimämmistä
     lämmin+A+Pl+Comp+Ill: lämpimämphiin
     lämmin+A+Pl+Comp+Ade: lämpimämmilä
     lämmin+A+Pl+Comp+Abl: lämpimämmiltä
     lämmin+A+Pl+Comp+All: lämpimämmile
     lämmin+A+Pl+Comp+Ess: lämpimämpinä
     lämmin+A+Pl+Comp+Com: lämpimämpine

     lämmin+A+Sg+Superl+Nom: lämpimin
     lämmin+A+Sg+Superl+Gen: lämpimimmän
     lämmin+A+Sg+Superl+Par: lämpimintä
     lämmin+A+Sg+Superl+Tra: lämpimimmäksi
     lämmin+A+Sg+Superl+Abe: lämpimimmättä
     lämmin+A+Sg+Superl+Ine: lämpimimmässä
     lämmin+A+Sg+Superl+Ela: lämpimimmästä
     lämmin+A+Sg+Superl+Ill: lämpimimphään
     lämmin+A+Sg+Superl+Ade: lämpimimmälä
     lämmin+A+Sg+Superl+Abl: lämpimimmältä
     lämmin+A+Sg+Superl+All: lämpimimmäle
     lämmin+A+Sg+Superl+Ess: lämpimimpänä
     lämmin+A+Pl+Superl+Nom: lämpimimmät
     lämmin+A+Pl+Superl+Gen: lämpimimppiin
     lämmin+A+Pl+Superl+Par: [lämpimimppii, lämpimimppiitä, lämpimimpiä]
     lämmin+A+Pl+Superl+Tra: lämpimimmiksi
     lämmin+A+Pl+Superl+Abe: lämpimimmittä
     lämmin+A+Pl+Superl+Ine: lämpimimmissä
     lämmin+A+Pl+Superl+Ela: lämpimimmistä
     lämmin+A+Pl+Superl+Ill: lämpimimphiin
     lämmin+A+Pl+Superl+Ade: lämpimimmilä
     lämmin+A+Pl+Superl+Abl: lämpimimmiltä
     lämmin+A+Pl+Superl+All: lämpimimmile
     lämmin+A+Pl+Superl+Ess: lämpimimpinä
     lämmin+A+Pl+Superl+Com: lämpimimpine
